apertium-pwn.pwn.lexd
LEXICON NounRoot
aljis:aljis             # teeth
alju:alju               # honey, sugar, sweets # pinavuavuan also has tjainan for honey
angalj:angalj           # mouth
asaw:asaw               # leaf
basu:basu               # bus
bibi:bibi               # duck
bugi:bugi               # boogie
bulu:bulu               # ball
calinga:calinga         # ear
calis:calis             # rope
caucau:caucau           # person
caqev:caqev             # lid
cavilj:cavilj           # year, also used for age
cekui:cekui             # table
cemdas:cemdas           # sunrise # also spelled cemedas
cemel:cemel             # grass, medicine
ceqel:cekel             # frog
cevulj:cevulj           # smoke
cikaw:cikaw             # fish
cingas:cingas           # the thing stuck between the teeth (?)
cis:cis                 # cheese
cumay:cumay             # bear
cuvuq:cuvuq             # bamboo shoot
daigaku:daigaku         # university # or daigakku
dingki:dingki           # light (electricity?)
dinguwa:dinguwa         # telephone
djalan:djalan           # road
djamay:djamay           # dish
djamuq:djamuq           # blood
djapalj:djapalj         # thigh
djaqis:djaqis           # forehead
djarunuq:djarunuq       # agaric # also spelled djalunuq
djaz:djaz               # jazz
djeljep:djeljep         # wall # also spelled deljep # yinavaljan also has kabi
djulis:djulis           # djulis
drail:drail             # monkey (only some dialect groups)
drakuyan:drakuyan       # basket
drava:drava             # friend (only yinavaljan)
dridri:dridri           # suckling pig
gadu:gadu               # mountain
gakku:gakku             # school
gang:gang               # crab
garuc:garuc             # comb
gitar:gitar             # guitar
guan:guan               # township
gung:gung               # cow, ox
guspil:guspil           # gospel
iku:iku                 # tail
inpic:inpic             # pen, pencil
kadjunangan:kadjunangan
kakakaka:kakakaka       # shadow
kakedrian:kakedrian     # child (also kakedriyan)
kalevelevan:kalevelevan # sky
kaljavevuan:kaljavevuan # spring (season) # yinavaljan also spells kaljavuvuwan
kaljusekusan:kaljusekusan # fingernail (also kaljuskusan)
kama:kama               # father
kapaz:kapaz             # root
kasiw:kasiw             # tree
kava:kava               # clothing
kaviz:kaviz             # chin
kay:kay                 # language # also spelled kai # yinavaljan also has ljavaran
kerilj:kerilj           # sparrow # also spelled kelilj
kina:kina               # mother
kinacavacavan:kinacavacavan # body
king:king               # county
kinsa:kinsa             # rice # yinavaljan also has tjinaljek
kisac{u}:kisac{u}       # police
kizing:kizing           # spoon
kriptukitis:kriptukitis # CryptoKitties
kucu:kucu               # head louse
kuisang:kuisang         # doctor
kula:kula               # foot (also kulu)
kulavaw:kulavaw         # mouse
kuli:kuli               # ice # also spelled kuri # pinavuavuan also has kiyaping
kumakuma:kumakuma       # spider
kumi:kumi               # girl
kumik:kumik             # comic
kupu:kupu               # cup # yinavaljan also has kadrukadrung and katjutjung
kutji:kutji             # female genetalia
ladjap:ladjap           # lightning
lala:lala               # cave
lava:lava               # flying squirrel
lavu:lavu               # rice bran
lekelek:lekelek         # bohemeria thread
lima:lima               # hand
ljaceng:ljaceng         # green vegetable
ljaves:ljaves           # guava
ljelet:ljelet           # lip
ljequ:ljequ             # owl
ljinay:ljinay           # umbrella
lukuc:lukuc             # bird-nest fern
luni:luni               # earthquake # pinavuavuan has it as a noun with verbability
maca:maca               # eye
masulem:masulem         # dusk
maqacuvucuvung:maqacuvucuvung # young people
meljay:meljay           # stop raining
midiya:midiya           # media
mitru:mitru             # metro
mitrubasu:mitrubasu     # metrobuses
mudingan:mudingan       # face
ngadan:ngadan           # name
ngadjay:ngadjay         # saliva
ngasa:ngasa             # crevice # pinavuavuan also has magac
ngiyaw:ngiyaw           # cat # in other dialects may be spelled ngiyau or ngiyav
ngudjus:ngudjus         # nose
pana:pana               # river, stream
paday:paday             # (white) rice
paisu:paisu             # money # or paysu
paljing:paljing         # door # yinavaljan also has siqeljevan
picul:picul             # strength # yinavaljan also has qizing
piku:piku               # elbow
piqay:piqay             # wound
piyanu:piyanu           # piano
pizza:pizza
pudru:pudru             # kidney
puitiks:puitiks         # poetics
puk:puk                 # pigeon pea
pulitik:pulitik         # politics
qacang:qacang           # pig
qacay:qacay             # liver
qaciljay:qaciljay       # stone
qadaw:qadaw             # sun, day # also spelled qadav
qadupu:qadupu           # paper, book # pinavuavuan also has laqulj for paper
qailjungan:qailjungan   # mirror
qalev:qalev             # grease (fat?) # in one dialect group also is abula or qalum
qali:qali               # friend
qalja:qalja             # enemy
qaljic:qaljic           # skin
qam:qam                 # pangolin (manis pentadactylata)
qapedu:qapedu           # gallbladder
qaqa:qaqa               # crow
qaqilj:qaqilj           # yam
qaselu:qaselu           # wooden pestle
qasi:qasi               # Protobothrops mucrosquamatus
qatiya:qatiya           # salt # also spelled qatia
qatjudray:qatjudray     # earthworm # yinavaljan also has qatjulalj
qatjuvi:qatjuvi         # snake
qatjuvitjuvi:qatjuvitjuvi # insect (collective) # does this mean this is a plural noun?
qau:qau                 # bamboo
qauzung:qauzung         # cockroach # yinavaljan also has qatjatjabang
qavan:qavan             # shoulder
qavu:qavu               # charcoal ash
qavuvung:qavuvung       # heart (body part)
qayaqayam:qayaqayam     # bird
qecilu:qecilu           # egg # some dialects also has tamagu
qeljuqeljuan:qeljuqeljuan # backyard # also spelled qeljuqeljuwan
qeluz:qeluz             # pillar
qerepus:qerepus         # cloud
qezung:qezung           # window # yinavaljan also has madu
qidung:qidung           # charcoal
qiladjan:qiladjan       # chair
qiljas:qiljas           # moon
qinaljan:qinaljan       # village, tribe
qipu:qipu               # soil
qudjalj:qudjalj         # rain(water)
quljivangeraw:quljivangeraw # rainbow
qulu:qulu               # head
qunuqunu:qunuqunu       # boy
quvalj:quvalj           # hair
quzang:quzang           # shrimp
ricing:ricing           # branch, twig
saksevung:saksevung     # Saxophone
sapuy:sapuy             # fire
sara:sara               # filter net
sasiq:sasiq             # ant
saviki:saviki           # betel nut
sema:sema               # tongue
semanvasizem:semanvasizem # fascism
senay:senay             # song
siak:siak               # pumpkin
sinsi:sinsi             # teacher(some dialects)
siquliqulip:siquliqulip # eraser
siqunu:siqunu           # knife
situ:situ               # student
siyuc:siyuc             # waist # also siuc
sizi:sizi               # sheep
sulja:sulja             # snow, possibly also frost
takec:takec             # muntiacus reevesi
taleng:taleng           # cypress # yinavaljan also has sugi
teljar:teljar           # gleam (probably noun)
teqic:teqic             # netting needle # pinavuavuan also has teqican
tequng:tequng           # horn
tilibi:tilibi           # television # also spelled tiribi or tilivi
tingnaw:tingnaw         # computer
tjainan:tjainan         # honeybee
tjaljetjalj:tjaljetjalj # stair # also spelled tjaljtjalj
tjalupung:tjalupung     # hat
tjanes:tjanes           # tangerine, orange
tjavuvuk:tjavuvuk       # wild strawberry
tjevus:tjevus           # sugar cane
tjidriyulj:tjidriyulj   # hornet
tjiyalj:tjiyalj         # belly # also tjialj
tuki:tuki               # watch, clock, bell # yinavaljan also includes the words kaljat for watch and milingan for clock
turivecan:turivecan     # tool
tutu:tutu               # breast
umaq:umaq               # home, house
uqaljay:uqaljay         # man
va:va                   # lung
vakela:vakela           # arrow
valanga:valanga         # wooden mortar
vali:vali               # wind, possibly also typhoon
valjes:valjes           # axe # yinavaljan also has putjaw
vangalj:vangalj         # fruit
vaqu:vaqu               # (foxtail) millet
varukur:varukur         # ship/boat
vasa:vasa               # taro
vat:vat                 # rice grains (hulled)
vatu:vatu               # dog
vaudj:vaudj             # rattan
vavayan:vavayan         # woman
vavuy:vavuy             # boar
veleljem:veleljem       # cloudy day # also spelled viljelem in yinavaljan
veljevelj:veljevelj     # banana
veljeluan:veljeluan     # creek, brook, stream
venan:venan             # sambar (cervus eldii)
vengeq:vengeq           # nasal mucus
vicuka:vicuka           # stomach
vitjuqan:vitjuqan       # star
vudas:vudas             # sand
vuday:vuday             # corn
vuljangaw:vuljangaw     # flower
vulungan:vulungan       # thumb
vuluq:vuluq             # spear
vunavun:vunavun         # seedling
vurasi:vurasi           # sweet potato # also spelled vurati
vutevutan:vutevutan     # calf (body part)
vutjulj:vutjulj         # meat, pork # in one dialect group also is qalum
vuvu:vuvu               # elder/grandparent
vuyu:vuyu               # chicken # in kinakacedasan # other words kuka (more dialects) or djurikuku (yinavaljan)
wugi:wugi               # woogie
zaljum:zaljum           # water
zu:zu                   # elephant # yinavaljan also has zung
zuyu:zuyu               # water ladle (for scooping water up) # yinavaljan also has levec

LEXICON PronounRoot(2)
aken:aken       <pers><sg><p1>:
sun:sun         <pers><sg><p2>:
madju:madju     <pers><sg><p3>:
tjen:tjen       <pers><pl><p1><incl>:
amen:amen       <pers><pl><p1><excl>:
mun:mun         <pers><pl><p2>:
amadju:amadju   <pers><pl><p3>:

LEXICON PronounCase(2)
:ti>            <nom>:
:ni>            <gen>:
:tjanu>         <obl>:
# There are some small issues with how I am currently defining these case markers

LEXICON NomCliticPronoun
<pers><sg><p1><nom>:>{a}ken
<pers><sg><p2><nom>:>{e}sun
<pers><pl><p1><incl><nom>:>{i}tjen
<pers><pl><p1><excl><nom>:>{a}men
<pers><pl><p2><nom>:>{e}mun

LEXICON GenCliticPronoun(2)
:ku>            <pers><sg><p1><gen>:
:su>            <pers><sg><p2><gen>:
:tja>           <pers><pl><p1><incl><gen>:
:nia>           <pers><pl><p1><excl><gen>:
:nu>            <pers><pl><p2><gen>:

LEXICON ConjuntionPrefix
:ka>

LEXICON NumberRoot
ita:ita                 # one
drusa:drusa             # two
tjelu:tjelu             # three
sepatj:sepatj           # four
lima:lima               # five
unem:unem               # six
pitju:pitju             # seven
alu:alu                 # eight
siva:siva               # nine
tapuluq:tapuluq         # ten
taiday:taiday           # one hundred

LEXICON Tens
puluq:puluq             # tens when making larger numbers

LEXICON NumberAnd
sa:sa                   # drusa puluq sa ita (twenty one) alu a puluq sa ita (eighty one)
